New York, session 2025-2026, A3668.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. The commissioner is authorized and directed, subject to appropri- 4 ation, to contract with a not-for-profit organization for a period of 5 three years, beginning in the two thousand twenty-six--two thousand 6 twenty-seven school year, to establish a program to address public 7 school teacher recruitment and retention in the state. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07671-01-5